Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4321
Bonds; issuance.

Subject only to any agreement with the holders of outstanding bonds, a risk management pool may issue such types of bonds as its board may determine, including bonds as to which the principal and interest are payable exclusively from all or a portion of the revenue from one or more revenue-producing contracts made by the risk management pool with any person, or from its revenue generally, or which may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant, subsidy, or contribution from any person, by a pledge of any income, revenue, funds, or money of the risk management pool from any source whatsoever, or by a mortgage or security interest in any real or personal property, commodity, or product or any service or interest therein.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 21.